Tennessee, session 114, SB0424.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-10-217, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
( ) The services authorized in a collaborative pharmacy practice agreement may
include weight management services.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0424
002415
- 1 -